Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2 Soil Conservation Districts
43-14-219. Land-use regulations — Adoption — Amendment or repeal — Provisions.

The supervisors of any district have the authority to formulate regulations governing the use of lands within the district, in the interest of conserving soil and soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion. The supervisors may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon tentative regulations as may be necessary to assist them in this work. The supervisors shall not have authority to enact land-use regulations, until after they have caused due notice to be given of their intention to conduct a referendum for submission of the regulations to the owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district, for their indication of approval or disapproval of the proposed regulations, and until after the supervisors have considered the result of the referendum. The proposed regulations shall be embodied in a proposed ordinance. Copies of the proposed ordinance shall be available for the inspection of all eligible voters during the period between publication of the notice and the date of the referendum. The notices of the referendum shall recite the contents of the proposed ordinance, or shall state where copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined. The supervisors shall supervise the referendum, shall prescribe appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the referendum, and shall publish the result of the referendum. All owners of lands within the district shall be eligible to vote in the referendum. Only landowners shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matter relating thereto shall invalidate the referendum or the result of the referendum, if notice of the referendum has been given substantially as provided in this subsection (a) and the referendum has been fairly conducted.

The supervisors shall not have authority to enact a proposed ordinance, unless at least two thirds (2/3) of the votes, cast in the referendum, of the landowners have been cast for approval of the proposed ordinance. The approval of the proposed ordinance by two thirds (2/3) of the votes cast in the referendum shall not be deemed to require the supervisors to enact the proposed ordinance into law. Land-use regulations prescribed in ordinances adopted, pursuant to this section, by the supervisors of any district shall have the force and effect of law in the district and shall be binding and obligatory upon all owners and occupiers of lands within the district.

Any owner of land within the district may at any time file a petition with the supervisors asking that any or all of the land-use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted by the supervisors under this section shall be amended, supplemented or repealed. Land-use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall not be amended, supplemented or repealed, except in accordance with the procedure prescribed in this section for adoption of land-use regulations. Referenda on adoption, amendment, supplementation or repeal of land-use regulations shall not be held more often than once in six (6) months.

The regulations to be adopted by the supervisors under this section may include:

Provisions requiring the carrying out of necessary engineering operations, including the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches and other necessary structures;

Provisions requiring observance of particular methods of cultivation, including contour cultivating, contour furrowing, lister furrowing, sowing, planting, strip cropping, seeding and planting of lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees and grasses, forestation and reforestation;

Specifications of cropping programs and tillage practices to be observed;

Provisions requiring the retirement from cultivation of highly erosive areas or of areas on which erosion may not be adequately controlled if cultivation is carried on; and

Provisions for such other means, measures, operations and programs as may assist conservation of soil resources and prevent or control soil erosion in the district.

The regulations shall be uniform throughout the territory comprised within the district, except that the supervisors may classify the lands within the district with reference to such factors as soil type, degree of slope, degree of erosion threatened or existing, cropping and tillage practices in use, and other relevant factors, and may provide regulations varying with the type or class of land affected, but uniform as to all lands within each class or type.

Copies of land-use regulations adopted under this section shall be printed and made available to all owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district.

Acts 1939, ch. 197, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.9 (Williams, § 552.39); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1519.

Cross-References. Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

Cited: Bemis Pentecostal Church v. State, 731 S.W.2d 897, 1987 Tenn. LEXIS 1064 (Tenn. 1987).

43-14-220. Damages for violation of land-use regulations — Determining observance.

Any landowner in the district, who sustains damages to the landowner's land as a result of violation of any land-use regulation by any other landowner in the district, may recover damages at law from the other landowner for such violation.

The supervisors have the authority to go upon any lands within the district to determine whether land-use regulations adopted under § 43-14-219 are being observed.

Acts 1939, ch. 197, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.10 (Williams, § 552.40); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1520.

43-14-221. Nonobservance of regulations basis of court action — Petition — Hearing — Enforcement of observance.

Where the supervisors of any district find that any land-use regulations, prescribed in an ordinance adopted in accordance with § 43-14-219 are not being observed on particular lands, and that this non-observance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, the supervisors may present to the circuit court or chancery court, for the county in which the defendant's land lies, a petition, duly verified, setting forth the adoption of the ordinance prescribing land-use regulations, the failure of the defendant landowner or occupier to observe the regulations, and to perform particular work, operations, or avoidances as required by the regulations, and that the nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, and praying the court to require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances within a reasonable time, and to order that, if the defendant fails so to perform, the supervisors may go on the land, perform the work or other operations or otherwise bring the condition of the lands into conformity with the requirements of the regulations, and recover the costs and expenses of the work or other operations, with interest, from the defendant.

Upon the presentation of the petition, the court shall cause process to be issued against the defendant, and shall hear the case. If it appears to the court that testimony is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, it may take evidence, or appoint a referee to take such evidence as it may direct and report the evidence to the court with the referee's findings of fact and conclusions of law, which shall constitute a part of the proceedings upon which the determination of the court shall be made.

The court may dismiss the petition; or it may require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances, and may provide that, upon the failure of the defendant to initiate performance within the time specified in the order of the court, and to prosecute the same to completion with reasonable diligence, the supervisors may enter upon the lands involved and perform the work or operations or otherwise bring the condition of the lands into conformity with the requirements of the regulations and recover the costs and expenses of the work or operations, with interest at the rate of five percent (5%) per annum, from the defendant. In all cases where the person in possession of lands, who fails to perform such work, operations, or avoidances, is not the owner, the owner of the lands shall be joined as party defendant.

The court shall retain jurisdiction of the case until after the work has been completed. Upon completion of such work, pursuant to such order of the court, the supervisors may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served upon the defendant in the case, stating the costs and expenses sustained by them in the performance of the work and praying judgment therefor with interest. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter judgment for the amount of such costs and expenses, with interest at the rate of five percent (5%) per annum until paid, together with the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee to be fixed by the court.

Acts 1939, ch. 197, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.11 (Williams, § 552.41); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1521.

43-14-222. Cooperation between districts.

The supervisors of any two (2) or more districts organized under this part may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this part.

Acts 1939, ch. 197, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.12 (Williams, § 552.42); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1522.

43-14-223. Discontinuance of districts — Petition — Notice — Hearing — Referendum — Determination by committee — Termination of affairs — Certificate of dissolution.

At any time after five (5) years after the organization of a district under this part, any twenty-five (25) owners of land, lying within the boundaries of the district, may file a petition with the state soil conservation committee praying that the operations of the district be terminated and the existence of the district discontinued. The committee may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon the petition as may be necessary to assist it in the consideration thereof. Within sixty (60) days after such a petition has been received by the committee, it shall give due notice of the holding of a referendum, and shall supervise a referendum, and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the referendum. All owners of land lying within the boundaries of the district shall be eligible to vote in the referendum. Only such landowners shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matters relating to the referendum shall invalidate the referendum or the results of the referendum, if notice has been given substantially as provided in this subsection (a) and the referendum has been fairly conducted.

The committee shall publish the results of the referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the committee determines that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record this determination and deny the petition. If the committee determines that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record this determination and shall certify the determination to the supervisors of the district. In making this determination, the committee shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district, the number of landowners eligible to vote in the referendum who have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in the referendum in favor of the discontinuance of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners and occupiers of the district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within the district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination; provided, that the committee shall not have authority to determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible, unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum have been cast in favor of the continuance of the district.

Upon receipt from the committee of a certification that the committee has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, pursuant to this section, the supervisors shall forthwith proceed to terminate the affairs of the district. The supervisors shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay over the proceeds of such sale to be covered into the state treasury. The supervisors shall thereupon file an application, duly verified, with the secretary of state for the discontinuance of the district, and shall transmit with the application the certificate of the committee, setting forth the determination of the committee that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over, as in this section provided, and shall set forth a full accounting of the properties and proceeds of the sale. The secretary of state shall issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution and shall record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution under this section, all ordinances and regulations previously adopted and in force within the districts shall be of no further force and effect. All contracts previously entered into, to which the district or supervisors are parties, shall remain in force and effect for the period provided in the contracts. The committee shall be substituted for the district or supervisors as party to the contracts. The committee shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under the contracts and shall have the same right and liability to perform, to require performance, to sue and be sued thereon, and to modify or terminate the contracts by mutual consent or otherwise, as the supervisors of the district would have had. The dissolution shall not affect the lien of any judgment entered under § 43-14-221, nor the pendency of any action instituted under that section, and the committee shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the district or supervisors as to such liens and actions.

The committee shall not entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district nor conduct referenda upon such petitions nor make determinations pursuant to such petitions in accordance with this part, more often than once in five (5) years.

Acts 1939, ch. 197, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 552.13 (Williams, § 552.43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-1523.